Utah statutes.
59-18-106.   Trustee's notice to attorney general of inconsistent provisions
in trust.
If the trustee determines that the governing instrument contains provisions,
in the case of a power to make distributions, which is more restrictive than
Subsection 59-18-105(2), or if the trust contains other powers which
specifically direct acts by the trustee that are inconsistent with the
provisions of Subsection 59-18-105(3), the trustee shall notify the attorney
general within six months following the effective date of this chapter, or
when the trust becomes subject to this chapter, whichever last occurs.
Section 59-18-105 does not apply to any trust with respect to which notice has
been given unless the trust is amended to comply with the terms of this
chapter.
